Hawaii statutes.
§183-42 Strip mining; prior approval of
license or permit. No original permit or license for strip mining on land
within the forest reserve boundaries shall be issued by any officer or agency
of the State without the prior approval and concurrence of the department. In
determining whether to grant or withhold such approval, the department shall be
guided by the standards set forth in chapter 183C. [L 1957, c 234, §3; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §19-71; HRS §183-42; am L 1981, c
85, §9; am L 1995, c 11, §4 and c 69, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next